fr: Caractéristiques de l’étui à lentilles de contact: Joint anti-fuite; Disque de neutralisation intégré; Paniers codés par couleur; Indicateurs gauche/droite; Miroir inclus; Réutilisable; Corps transparent; Format voyage; Désinfection UV; Port de ventilation; Autre
bg-BG: Характеристики на кутията за контактни лещи: Уплътнение против изтичане; Вграден неутрализиращ диск; Цветово кодирани кошнички; Индикатори ляво/дясно; Включено огледало; За многократна употреба; Прозрачен корпус; Удобен за пътуване размер; UV дезинфекция; Вентилационен отвор; Други
sl-SI: Značilnosti etuija za kontaktne leče: Zaščita pred puščanjem; Vgrajen nevtralizacijski disk; Barvno označene košarice; Oznake levo/desno; Ogledalo vključeno; Za večkratno uporabo; Prozorno ohišje; Velikost primerna za potovanje; UV dezinfekcija; Prezračevalna odprtina; Drugo
ru: Характеристики контейнера для контактных линз: Защита от протекания; Встроенный нейтрализующий диск; Цветные корзинки; Индикаторы левый/правый; Зеркало в комплекте; Многоразовый; Прозрачный корпус; Удобный для путешествий размер; УФ-дезинфекция; Вентиляционное отверстие; Другой
ja: コンタクトレンズケース機能: 漏れ防止シール; 内蔵中和ディスク; カラーコードバスケット; 左右表示; ミラー付き; 再利用可能; 透明ボディ; 旅行に便利なサイズ; UV殺菌; 通気ポート; その他
hu: Kontaktlencsetok jellemzői: Szivárgásmentes tömítés; Beépített semlegesítő korong; Színkódolt kosarak; Bal/jobb jelzők; Tükörrel ellátott; Újrafelhasználható; Átlátszó test; Utazásbarát méret; UV fertőtlenítés; Szellőzőnyílás; Egyéb
da: Kontaktlinseetuies funktioner: Anti-lækage forsegling; Indbygget neutraliseringsskive; Farvekodede kurve; Venstre/højre indikatorer; Spejl inkluderet; Genanvendelig; Gennemsigtig krop; Rejsevenlig størrelse; UV-desinfektion; Ventilationsport; Andet
de: Kontaktlinsenbehälter-Eigenschaften: Auslaufsichere Versiegelung; Eingebaute Neutralisierungsscheibe; Farbcodierte Körbe; Links/Rechts-Indikatoren; Spiegel enthalten; Wiederverwendbar; Transparenter Körper; Reisefreundliche Größe; UV-Desinfektion; Belüftungsöffnung; Sonstiges
es: Características del estuche para lentes de contacto: Sello antifugas; Disco neutralizador integrado; Cestas con código de colores; Indicadores izquierda/derecha; Espejo incluido; Reusable; Cuerpo transparente; Tamaño apto para viajes; Desinfección UV; Puerto de ventilación; Otros
en: Contact lens case features: Anti-leak seal; Built-in neutralizing disc; Color-coded baskets; Left/Right indicators; Mirror included; Reusable; Transparent body; Travel-friendly size; UV disinfection; Ventilation port; Other
pt-BR: Recursos do estojo de lentes de contato: Vedação antivazamento; Disco neutralizador integrado; Cestos com código de cores; Indicadores esquerda/direita; Espelho incluído; Reutilizável; Corpo transparente; Tamanho ideal para viagem; Desinfecção UV; Porta de ventilação; Outro
zh-CN: 隐形眼镜盒特点: 防漏密封; 内置中和片; 颜色编码篮; 左右标识; 含镜子; 可重复使用; 透明机身; 旅行便携尺寸; 紫外线消毒; 通风口; 其他
cs: Funkce pouzdra na kontaktní čočky: Protisáková těsnění; Vestavěný neutralizační disk; Barevně rozlišené košíky; Indikátory levé/pravé; Včetně zrcátka; Opakovaně použitelné; Průhledné tělo; Cestovní velikost; UV dezinfekce; Ventilační otvor; Jiné
el: Χαρακτηριστικά θήκης φακών επαφής: Αντιδιαρροϊκή σφράγιση; Ενσωματωμένος δίσκος εξουδετέρωσης; Χρωματικά κωδικοποιημένα καλάθια; Ενδείξεις αριστερά/δεξιά; Περιλαμβάνεται καθρέφτης; Επαναχρησιμοποιήσιμο; Διαφανές σώμα; Μέγεθος φιλικό για ταξίδι; Απολύμανση UV; Θυρίδα εξαερισμού; Άλλο
th: คุณสมบัติตลับคอนแทคเลนส์: ซีลป้องกันการรั่ว; แผ่นปรับสภาพในตัว; ตะกร้าแยกสี; ตัวบ่งชี้ซ้าย/ขวา; มีกระจก; ใช้ซ้ำได้; ตัวเคสโปร่งใส; ขนาดพกพาสะดวก; ฆ่าเชื้อด้วยยูวี; ช่องระบายอากาศ; อื่นๆ
pt-PT: Características do estojo de lentes de contacto: Vedação anti-fugas; Disco neutralizador integrado; Cestas com código de cores; Indicadores esquerda/direita; Espelho incluído; Reutilizável; Corpo transparente; Tamanho ideal para viagem; Desinfeção UV; Porta de ventilação; Outro
tr: Uyumlu kontak lens tipi: Sızıntı önleyici conta; Dahili nötrleştirici disk; Renk kodlu sepetler; Sol/sağ göstergeleri; Ayna dahil; Yeniden kullanılabilir; Şeffaf gövde; Seyahat dostu boyut; UV dezenfeksiyonu; Havalandırma portu; Diğer
sv: Kontaktlinsfodralets funktioner: Läckagesäker tätning; Inbyggd neutraliseringsskiva; Färgkodade korgar; Vänster/höger-indikatorer; Spegel ingår; Återanvändbar; Transparent hölje; Resevänlig storlek; UV-desinfektion; Ventilationsport; Övrigt
vi: Tính năng hộp kính áp tròng: Nắp chống rò rỉ; Đĩa trung hòa tích hợp; Giỏ mã màu; Chỉ báo trái/phải; Có gương đi kèm; Tái sử dụng; Thân trong suốt; Kích thước tiện du lịch; Khử trùng UV; Cổng thông gió; Khác
ko: 콘택트렌즈 케이스 기능: 누출 방지 씰; 내장 중화 디스크; 색상 구분 바구니; 좌/우 표시; 거울 포함; 재사용 가능; 투명 본체; 휴대용 사이즈; UV 살균; 환기구; 기타
pl: Cechy etui na soczewki kontaktowe: Uszczelnienie przeciwwyciekowe; Wbudowany dysk neutralizujący; Kolorowo oznaczone koszyczki; Oznaczenia lewa/prawa; Dołączone lusterko; Wielokrotnego użytku; Przezroczysta obudowa; Rozmiar przyjazny w podróży; Dezynfekcja UV; Port wentylacyjny; Inne
fi: Piilolinssikotelon ominaisuudet: Vuodonestotiiviste; Sisäänrakennettu neutralointilevy; Värikoodatut korit; Vasen/oikea -merkit; Peili mukana; Uudelleen käytettävä; Läpinäkyvä runko; Matkaystävällinen koko; UV-desinfiointi; Tuuletusportti; Muu
ro-RO: Caracteristicile cutiei pentru lentile de contact: Sigiliu anti-scurgere; Disc de neutralizare încorporat; Coșuri codificate cromatic; Indicatori stânga/dreapta; Oglindă inclusă; Reutilizabil; Corp transparent; Dimensiune prietenoasă pentru călătorie; Dezinfecție UV; Port de ventilație; Altele
lt-LT: Kontaktinių lęšių dėklo savybės: Apsauginis sandariklis nuo nutekėjimo; Integruotas neutralizavimo diskas; Spalvomis koduoti krepšeliai; Kairės/dešinės indikatoriai; Veidrodis pridedamas; Daugkartinis; Permatomas korpusas; Kelionėms patogus dydis; UV dezinfekcija; Ventiliacijos anga; Kita
sk-SK: Funkcie puzdra na kontaktné šošovky: Tesniace proti vytečeniu; Zabudovaný neutralizačný disk; Farebne odlíšené košíky; Označenie ľavá/pravá; Vrátane zrkadielka; Opakovane použiteľný; Priehľadné telo; Cestovná veľkosť; UV dezinfekcia; Vetrací otvor; Iné
nb: Kontaktlinseetuifunksjoner: Lekkasjebeskyttelse; Innebygd nøytraliseringsskive; Fargekodede kurver; Venstre/høyre-indikatorer; Speil inkludert; Gjenbrukbare; Gjennomsiktig kropp; Reisevennlig størrelse; UV-desinfeksjon; Ventilasjonsport; Annet
nl: Contactlensdoos functies: Lekvrije afsluiting; Ingebouwde neutralisatieschijf; Kleurgecodeerde mandjes; Links/rechts indicatoren; Spiegel inbegrepen; Herbruikbaar; Transparante behuizing; Reisvriendelijk formaat; UV-desinfectie; Ventilatiepoort; Andere
hr-HR: Značajke kutije za kontaktne leće: Brtva protiv curenja; Ugrađeni disk za neutralizaciju; Košarice kodirane bojama; Indikatori lijevo/desno; Uključeno ogledalo; Za višekratnu upotrebu; Prozirno kućište; Veličina prikladna za putovanje; UV dezinfekcija; Ventilacijski otvor; Ostalo
zh-TW: 隱形眼鏡盒特色: 防漏密封; 內建中和片; 顏色標示籃; 左/右標示; 附鏡子; 可重複使用; 透明盒身; 旅行便攜尺寸; 紫外線消毒; 透氣孔; 其他
it: Caratteristiche della custodia per lenti a contatto: Sigillo anti-perdite; Disco neutralizzante incorporato; Cestelli con codice colore; Indicatori sinistra/destra; Specchio incluso; Riutilizzabile; Corpo trasparente; Dimensioni da viaggio; Disinfezione UV; Porta di ventilazione; Altro